Hawaii statutes.
§381-9 Strikes and lockouts prohibited,
when. (a) It shall be unlawful for any employees of a public utility to
call a strike or go out on strike causing or threatening to cause an
interruption of public utility service, or for any public utility to lock out
its employees when the action would cause or threaten to cause an interruption
of public utility service, except as the action may be taken in compliance with
this chapter.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person or
persons to instigate, induce, or encourage any other person or persons to
engage in any strike or lockout that would cause an interruption of public
utility service in violation of this chapter.

(c) During the term of any collective
bargaining agreement, there shall be no lockout by the public utility and there
shall be no strike on the part of any employees covered by the agreement,
except where:

(1) A dispute arises under the agreement concerning
the interpretation or application of the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement, and the agreement contains no procedure for the settlement of the
dispute; or

(2) In accordance with the terms of the collective
bargaining agreement, the parties undertake negotiations for a new agreement or
an amendment of the existing agreement pursuant to specific designation in the
agreement of a certain time or period for the negotiations, no agreement has
been reached at the expiration of the time or period, and the agreement does
not prohibit strikes or lockouts following the negotiation and failure to
arrive at agreement;

provided that the provisions of this chapter for
settlement of disputes have first been complied with. [L 1949, c 146, pt of §1;
RL 1955, §91-10; HRS §381-9; am L 2016, c 55, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next